Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.270

Sexual assault—Training for investigating and prosecuting.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5356-S2.SL) ***

(1) Each year the criminal justice training commission shall offer an intensive, integrated training session on investigating and prosecuting sexual assault cases. The training shall place particular emphasis on the development of professionalism and sensitivity towards the victim and the victim's family.

(2) The commission shall seek advice from the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington defender association, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and the Washington coalition of sexual assault programs.

(3) The training shall be an integrated approach to sexual assault cases so that prosecutors, law enforcement, defenders, and victim advocates can all benefit from the training.

(4) The training shall be self-supporting through fees charged to the participants of the training.

(5) The training shall include a reference to the possibility that a court may allow children under the age of fourteen to testify in a room outside the presence of the defendant and the jury pursuant to RCW 9A.44.150.

[2015 c 286 s 2; 1991 c 267 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2015 c 286: "(1) The legislature finds that RCW 9A.44.150, which allows testimony of child victims by closed-circuit television in certain cases, helps protect certain child witnesses. During the prosecution of many child abuse cases, child victims may suffer serious emotional and mental trauma from exposure to the abuser. Some of these child victims are unable to testify at all in the presence of the abuser. For these reasons, the legislature found it a compelling state interest to allow for remote testimony in certain cases to enhance the truth-seeking process and to shield child victims from trauma.

(2) The legislature further finds that while there is a possibility for certain child victims to testify remotely in some cases, this procedure is rarely used. The legislature intends to raise awareness regarding this procedure by including it in training materials for investigating and prosecuting sexual assault cases." [2015 c 286 s 1.]

Findings—1991 c 267: "The safety of all children is enhanced when sexual assault cases are properly investigated and prosecuted. The victim of the sexual assault and the victim's family have a right to be treated with sensitivity and professionalism, which also increases the likelihood of their continued cooperation with the investigation and prosecution of the case. The legislature finds the sexual assault cases, particularly those involving victims who are children, are difficult to prosecute successfully. The cooperation of a victim and the victim's family through the investigation and prosecution of the sexual assault case is enhanced and the trauma associated with the investigation and prosecution is reduced when trained victim advocates assist the victim and the victim's family through the investigation and prosecution of the case. Trained victim advocates also assist law enforcement, prosecutors, and defense attorneys, by relieving some of the burden of explaining the investigation and prosecution process and possible delays to the victim and accompanying the victim during interviews by the police, prosecutor, and defense attorney, and accompanying the victim during hearings and the trial.

The legislature finds that counties should give priority to the successful prosecution of sexual assault cases, especially those that involve children, by ensuring that prosecutors, investigators, defense attorneys, and victim advocates are properly trained and available. Therefore, the legislature intends to establish a mechanism to provide the necessary training of prosecutors, law enforcement investigators, defense attorneys, and victim advocates and ensure the availability of victim advocates for victims of sexual assault and their families." [1991 c 267 s 1.]

Effective date—1991 c 267: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1991." [1991 c 267 s 7.]